North Carolina, session 2025, SB1060.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Legislative Findings. – The General Assembly finds all of the
following:
(1) Sexual assault and harassment within military populations undermines
readiness, unit cohesion, survivor well-being, and family stability.
(2) Members of the National Guard and other reserve components face distinct
barriers due to part-time service, geographic dispersion, and transitions
between State and federal duty status.
(3) Access to trained response personnel is critical, particularly for geographically
dispersed or isolated units.
(4) Service members, veterans, and military families may experience difficulty
navigating available military and civilian support systems.
(5) North Carolina has a compelling State interest in supporting
military-connected populations.
(6) Establishing a State-level pilot program to connect survivors to existing
providers while incorporating military-informed peer support and navigation
will strengthen access to care, improve service utilizations, and inform future
statewide implementation without duplicating existing services.
SECTION 2. Definitions. – As used in this act, the following definitions apply:
(1) Military sexual trauma. – Sexual assault or repeated threatening sexual
harassment during military service.
(2) Reserve components. – Defined in 38 U.S.C. § 101.
SECTION 3.(a) Military Sexual Trauma Study Commission. – There is established
the North Carolina Military Sexual Trauma Study Commission (Commission). The Commission
shall have the following functions and duties:
(1) Study the following subject matters with regard to military sexual trauma:
a. The prevalence of military sexual trauma among active duty military
personnel and reserve components.
b. Barriers to reporting military sexual trauma such as retaliation and
confidentiality concerns.
c. Coordination gaps between federal, State, and civilian systems for
reporting and reduction of military sexual trauma.
*S1060-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
d. Availability and accessibility of support services.
e. Jurisdictional challenges on and off military installations.
f. Impact on women in military service and military spouses and
dependents.
g. Challenges specific to reserve components and National Guard
transitions to active duty.
h. Capacity of the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs to serve
as a coordinating entity in the support of those affected by military
sexual trauma.
(2) Submit a final report to the General Assembly on the Commission's findings
and any legislative recommendations no later than April 1, 2027.
SECTION 3.(b) Membership. – The North Carolina Military Sexual Trauma Study
Commission shall consist of 14 members. The makeup of the Commission is as follows:
(1) Two members appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.
(2) Two members appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.
(3) One member currently serving with the North Carolina National Guard.
(4) One member currently serving with a non-National Guard reserve component
of the Armed Forces.
(5) One member currently employed by the Department of Military and Veterans
Affairs.
(6) One member currently employed by the Department of Health and Human
Services.
(7) One member currently employed by the Administrative Office of the Courts.
(8) Two members with expertise in military justice.
(9) Two members currently involved with sexual trauma survivor advocacy
organizations.
(10) One member who is a licensed mental health professional.
The Department of Military and Veterans Affairs shall provide staff support,
logistical assistance, and subject-matter expertise to the Commission.
SECTION 3.(c) Termination. – The North Carolina Military Sexual Trauma Study
Commission shall terminate upon submission of its final report required pursuant to Section
3(a)(2) of this act.
SECTION 4.(a) Pilot Program. – The Department of Military and Veterans Affairs
shall partner with the Department of Health and Human Services to develop and implement the
Military Sexual Trauma Support Pilot Program (Pilot Program), a two-year pilot program
providing support to victims of military sexual trauma. The Pilot Program shall consist of the
following initiatives:
(1) Creating and implementing a 24/7 confidential hotline to report instances of
military sexual trauma.
(2) Providing trauma-informed counseling to covered individuals affected by
military sexual trauma.
(3) Providing legal referral services to covered individuals affected by military
sexual trauma.
(4) Providing emergency assistance to covered individuals affected by military
sexual trauma.
(5) Conducting outreach to active duty, reserve components, veterans, and
military families.
(6) Acting as a liaison between covered individuals affected by military sexual
trauma and federal partners.
(7) Coordinating with the Sexual Assault and Prevention Office and response
programs of the United States Department of Defense.
Page 2 Senate Bill 1060-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(8) Establishing training standards in consultation with the Department of Health
and Human Services and advocacy organizations.
(9) Maintaining a directory of services available to those affected by military
sexual trauma.
SECTION 4.(b) Covered Individuals. – This act applies to the following groups:
(1) Active duty service members stationed in North Carolina.
(2) Members of the reserve components of the United States Armed Forces,
including members of the North Carolina National Guard.
(3) Veterans.
(4) Military spouses and dependents.
SECTION 4.(c) Peer Support Network. – As part of the Pilot Program, the
Department of Military and Veterans Affairs shall establish a peer support network. The network
shall consist of volunteers who are covered individuals under this section. All volunteers shall be
trained in trauma-informed care, military culture competency, and confidentiality laws. The peer
support network shall be accessible through a confidential hotline as well as online platforms.
SECTION 4.(d) Military Sexual Trauma Coordinator. – The Department of Military
and Veterans Affairs shall designate a Military Sexual Trauma Coordinator to be responsible for
oversight of the Pilot Program, interagency coordination, and policy recommendations.
SECTION 4.(e) Statewide Data Coordination. – The Department of Military and
Veterans Affairs shall serve as the central coordinating entity for military sexual trauma data.
Subject to limits to access of federal investigative records, the Department of Military and
Veterans Affairs shall:
(1) Aggregate anonymized data.
(2) Track utilization of military sexual trauma support services.
(3) Identify trends of military sexual trauma among active duty and reserve
components.
(4) Publish annual reports on its findings in a conspicuous location on the
Department of Military and Veterans Affairs website.
SECTION 4.(f) Evaluation and Reporting. – The Department of Military and
Veterans Affairs, in coordination with the Department of Health and Human Services, shall
evaluate the Pilot Program and shall provide an interim report of the Pilot Program to the General
Assembly no later than March 1, 2027, and a final report no later than March 1, 2028. The final
report shall include information on the utilization of the Pilot Program, outcomes, and
continuation and expansion recommendations, as applicable.
SECTION 4.(g) Termination. – The Pilot Program shall terminate on June 30, 2028,
unless unanimously extended by the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs and the
Department of Health and Human Services.
SECTION 5. National Guard Reporting Channels. – The North Carolina National
Guard shall establish confidential reporting channels for military sexual trauma. All reports shall
be anonymized by removing all identifying information and reported to the Department of
Military and Veterans Affairs annually.
SECTION 6. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Military and Veterans Affairs the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) in recurring funds
beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used for implementation of the Military Sexual
Trauma Study Commission and the Military Sexual Trauma Support Pilot Program. There is
appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Health and Human Services the sum
of two million dollars ($2,000,000) in recurring funds beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to
be used for implementation of the Military Sexual Trauma Study Commission and the Military
Sexual Trauma Support Pilot Program.
SECTION 7. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
Senate Bill 1060-First Edition Page 3